North Carolina, session 2025, SB1035.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-83.31 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.31. Exit standards and graduation requirements.
(a) The State Board of Education shall require the following for high school graduation:
…
(4) Passing grades in a sequence of four mathematics courses consistent with the
following:
a. NC Math 1.
b. NC Math 2.
c. Two additional mathematics courses required as part of one of the
following pathway-aligned options adopted by the State Board:
1. College preparatory pathway.
2. Career and technical education (CTE) pathway.
3. Quantitative reasoning and statistics pathway.
4. Science, technology, engineering, and math (STEM)
pathway."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-158.10(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules establishing minimum requirements
for career development plans and shall require local boards of education to provide access to all
career development plans through a designated electronic application. Career development plans
shall include at least the following:
…
(3) Alignment of academic courses and extracurricular activities with the
student's identified career interests, including the following:
a. Inventory of aligned courses in middle and high school in grades six
through 10, and development of best strategies for course selection in
*S1035-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
grades 11 and 12 to achieve identified career interests, including
courses that may lead to college credit.
b. Available record of the following:
1. Completed Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate,
Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of Education
(AICE), and dual-enrollment courses that may lead to college
credit in high school.
2. Extracurricular activities.
3. Awards and recognitions.
c. Pathway-aligned sequences of mathematics courses adopted by the
State Board of Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.31."
…."
SECTION 3. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for pathway-aligned
sequences of mathematics courses to be offered in high schools in the State by July 1, 2027. The
State Board shall consult the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina and the
State Board of Community Colleges to ensure that all pathways align with the University of
North Carolina minimum admission standards, North Carolina Community Colleges System
expectations, and workforce and industry needs. Pathway-aligned sequences of courses adopted
pursuant to the requirements of this section shall not apply to students who have been identified
as a child with a disability in accordance with Article 9 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes
and whose IEP team has determined cannot satisfy the standard state graduation requirements.
The State Board shall adopt the following pathway-aligned sequences of mathematics courses:
(1) A college preparatory pathway designed for students planning to attend a
four-year college or university that includes NC Math 3 and another high level
mathematics course, such as the following:
a. Precalculus.
b. Advanced functions.
c. Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate, or Cambridge
Advanced International Certificate of Education level mathematics
courses.
d. Equivalent courses as determined by the State Board.
(2) A career and technical education (CTE) pathway designed for students
planning to pursue workforce or technical careers that includes the following:
a. Applied math or integrated mathematics courses aligned to CTE
programs.
b. Courses that incorporate algebra, statistics, and quantitative reasoning
in real-world contexts.
(3) A quantitative reasoning and statistics pathway designed for students planning
to pursue careers in fields that require data literacy and applied mathematics
that includes the following:
a. NC Math 3 or an equivalent course approved by the State Board.
b. Statistics, data science, or quantitative reasoning courses.
(4) A science, technology, engineering, and math (STEM) pathway designed for
students planning to pursue careers in STEM fields that includes NC Math 3
and another high level mathematics course, such as the following:
a. Precalculus.
b. Calculus.
c. Other advanced mathematics courses approved by the State Board.
SECTION 4. Each local school administrative unit shall submit to the Department
of Public Instruction the number of students following each pathway at the conclusion of each
school year, beginning with the 2028-2029 school year. The Department of Public Instruction
Page 2 Senate Bill 1035-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by March 15, 2034,
on the following:
(1) The number of students enrolled in each mathematics pathway.
(2) Post-graduation outcomes for students, disaggregated by pathway, to the
extent information is available.
(3) High school graduation rates disaggregated by pathway, to the extent
information is available.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 6. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective July 1, 2028, and apply
beginning with students entering ninth grade during the 2028-2029 school year. The remainder
of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 1035-First Edition Page 3